Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2607
Notice.

(a) A copy of an environmental covenant shall be provided by the persons and in the manner required by the agency to:

(1) Each person that signed the covenant;

(2) Each person holding a recorded interest in the real property subject to the covenant;

(3) Each person in possession of the real property subject to the covenant;

(4) Each municipality or other unit of local government in which real property subject to the covenant is located; and

(5) Any other person the agency requires.

(b) The validity of a covenant is not affected by failure to provide a copy of the covenant as required under this section.

Laws 2005, LB 298, § 8.